dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX BP Y 78
SFX BP ti l .
SFX BP ti la .
SFX BP ti lo .
SFX BP ti li .
SFX BP zati žų .
SFX BP zati žem .
SFX BP zati žeš .
SFX BP zati že .
SFX BP zati žemȯ .
SFX BP zati žete .
SFX BP zati žųt .
SFX BP ti h .
SFX BP ti še .
SFX BP ti hmȯ .
SFX BP ti ste .
SFX BP ti hų .
SFX BP zati ži .
SFX BP zati žimȯ .
SFX BP zati žite .
SFX BP zati žųći .
SFX BP zati žųćego .
SFX BP zati žųćemu .
SFX BP zati žųćim .
SFX BP zati žųćem .
SFX BP zati žųćih .
SFX BP zati žųćimi .
SFX BP zati žųća .
SFX BP zati žųće .
SFX BP zati žemy .
SFX BP zati žemogo .
SFX BP zati žemomu .
SFX BP zati žemym .
SFX BP zati žemom .
SFX BP zati žemo .
SFX BP zati žema .
SFX BP zati žemų .
SFX BP zati žemoj .
SFX BP zati žemojų .
SFX BP zati žemi .
SFX BP zati žeme .
SFX BP zati žemyh .
SFX BP zati žemym .
SFX BP zati žemymi .
SFX BP zati žemo .
SFX BP ti vši .
SFX BP ti všego .
SFX BP ti všemu .
SFX BP ti všim .
SFX BP ti všem .
SFX BP ti vših .
SFX BP ti všimi .
SFX BP ti vša .
SFX BP ti všų .
SFX BP ti všej .
SFX BP ti všejų .
SFX BP ti vše .
SFX BP ti ny .
SFX BP ti nogo .
SFX BP ti nomu .
SFX BP ti nym .
SFX BP ti nom .
SFX BP ti ni .
SFX BP ti ne .
SFX BP ti nyh .
SFX BP ti nymi .
SFX BP ti na .
SFX BP ti nų .
SFX BP ti noj .
SFX BP ti nojų .
SFX BP ti no .
SFX BP ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX BP ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX BP ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX BP ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX BP ti nij/xPxE .
SFX BP ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX BP ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX BP ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX BQ Y 5
SFX BQ obě ebę .
SFX BQ obě ę .
SFX BQ obě ebe .
SFX BQ obě i .
SFX BQ ě ojų .

SFX BR Y 5
SFX BR i ebę .
SFX BR i ę .
SFX BR i ebe .
SFX BR i obě .
SFX BR i obojų .

SFX BS Y 60
SFX BS ti l .
SFX BS ti la .
SFX BS ti lo .
SFX BS ti li .
SFX BS ti jų .
SFX BS ti jem .
SFX BS ti ješ .
SFX BS ti je .
SFX BS ti jemȯ .
SFX BS ti jete .
SFX BS ti jųt .
SFX BS ti h .
SFX BS ti še .
SFX BS ti hmȯ .
SFX BS ti ste .
SFX BS ti hų .
SFX BS ti j .
SFX BS ti jmȯ .
SFX BS ti jte .
SFX BS ti jųći .
SFX BS ti jųćego .
SFX BS ti jųćemu .
SFX BS ti jųćim .
SFX BS ti jųćem .
SFX BS ti jųćih .
SFX BS ti jųćimi .
SFX BS ti jųća .
SFX BS ti jųće .
SFX BS ti jemy .
SFX BS ti jemogo .
SFX BS ti jemomu .
SFX BS ti jemym .
SFX BS ti jemom .
SFX BS ti jemo .
SFX BS ti jema .
SFX BS ti jemų .
SFX BS ti jemoj .
SFX BS ti jemojų .
SFX BS ti jemi .
SFX BS ti jeme .
SFX BS ti jemyh .
SFX BS ti jemym .
SFX BS ti jemymi .
SFX BS ti jemo .
SFX BS ti vši .
SFX BS ti všego .
SFX BS ti všemu .
SFX BS ti všim .
SFX BS ti všem .
SFX BS ti vših .
SFX BS ti všimi .
SFX BS ti vša .
SFX BS ti všų .
SFX BS ti všej .
SFX BS ti všejų .
SFX BS ti vše .
SFX BS i y .
SFX BS i a .
SFX BS i o .
SFX BS ti ťje .

SFX BT Y 11
SFX BT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BT 0 y/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 om/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX BT k če/xPxE .

SFX BU Y 18
SFX BU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX BU j 0 .
SFX BU j i/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 e/xPxE .
SFX BU j e/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BU j ev/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BU j ah/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BU j am/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BU j em/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 em/xPxE .
SFX BU j ami/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX BV Y 19
SFX BV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BV ȯť ť/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťe/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 e/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťa/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťev/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťu/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťah/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťam/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťem/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 em/xPxE .
SFX BV ȯť ťami/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX BW Y 10
SFX BW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BW ś si/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 em/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX BX Y 26
SFX BX 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BX i e/xPxE .
SFX BX i a/xPxE .
SFX BX i ego/xBxPxE .
SFX BX i ų/xPxE .
SFX BX i ej/xPxE .
SFX BX i em/xPxE .
SFX BX i emu/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 m/xPxE .
SFX BX i ejų/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 h/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX BX i ejši/zz .
SFX BX i ejšego/zz .
SFX BX i ejšemu/zz .
SFX BX i ejšim/zz .
SFX BX i ejšem/zz .
SFX BX i ejše/zz .
SFX BX i ejša/zz .
SFX BX i ejšų/zz .
SFX BX i ejšej/zz .
SFX BX i ejšejų/zz .
SFX BX i ejših/zz .
SFX BX i ejšim/zz .
SFX BX i ejšimi/zz .
SFX BX i eje/zz .

SFX BY Y 69
SFX BY ti l .
SFX BY ti la .
SFX BY ti lo .
SFX BY ti li .
SFX BY ěti jų .
SFX BY ěti im .
SFX BY ěti iš .
SFX BY ěti i .
SFX BY ěti imȯ .
SFX BY ěti ite .
SFX BY ěti ęt .
SFX BY ti h .
SFX BY ti še .
SFX BY ti hmȯ .
SFX BY ti ste .
SFX BY ti hų .
SFX BY ěti ęći .
SFX BY ěti ęća .
SFX BY ěti ęće .
SFX BY ěti imy .
SFX BY ěti imogo .
SFX BY ěti imomu .
SFX BY ěti imym .
SFX BY ěti imom .
SFX BY ěti imo .
SFX BY ěti ima .
SFX BY ěti imų .
SFX BY ěti imoj .
SFX BY ěti imojų .
SFX BY ěti imi .
SFX BY ěti ime .
SFX BY ěti imyh .
SFX BY ěti imym .
SFX BY ěti imymi .
SFX BY ěti imo .
SFX BY ti vši .
SFX BY ti všego .
SFX BY ti všemu .
SFX BY ti všim .
SFX BY ti všem .
SFX BY ti vših .
SFX BY ti všimi .
SFX BY ti vša .
SFX BY ti všų .
SFX BY ti všej .
SFX BY ti všejų .
SFX BY ti vše .
SFX BY ti ny .
SFX BY ti nogo .
SFX BY ti nomu .
SFX BY ti nym .
SFX BY ti nom .
SFX BY ti ni .
SFX BY ti ne .
SFX BY ti nyh .
SFX BY ti nymi .
SFX BY ti na .
SFX BY ti nų .
SFX BY ti noj .
SFX BY ti nojų .
SFX BY ti no .
SFX BY ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX BY ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX BY ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX BY ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX BY ti nij/xPxE .
SFX BY ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX BY ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX BY ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX BZ Y 11
SFX BZ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BZ 0 y/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 om/xPxE .
SFX BZ 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX BZ h še/xPxE .

SFX Ba Y 28
SFX Ba 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ba y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Ba y a/xPxE .
SFX Ba y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Ba y ų/xPxE .
SFX Ba y oj/xPxE .
SFX Ba y om/xPxE .
SFX Ba y omu/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ba y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Ba y i/xPxE .
SFX Ba y e/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ba oky ši/zz .
SFX Ba oky šego/zz .
SFX Ba oky šemu/zz .
SFX Ba oky šim/zz .
SFX Ba oky šem/zz .
SFX Ba oky še/zz .
SFX Ba oky ša/zz .
SFX Ba oky šų/zz .
SFX Ba oky šej/zz .
SFX Ba oky šejų/zz .
SFX Ba oky ših/zz .
SFX Ba oky šim/zz .
SFX Ba oky šimi/zz .
SFX Ba soky še/xPxE .

SFX Bb Y 32
SFX Bb ti l .
SFX Bb ti la .
SFX Bb ti lo .
SFX Bb ti li .
SFX Bb ěti ajų .
SFX Bb ěti ajem .
SFX Bb ěti aješ .
SFX Bb ěti aje .
SFX Bb ěti ajemȯ .
SFX Bb ěti ajete .
SFX Bb ěti ajųt .
SFX Bb ti h .
SFX Bb ti še .
SFX Bb ti hmȯ .
SFX Bb ti ste .
SFX Bb ti hų .
SFX Bb ěti aj .
SFX Bb ěti ajmȯ .
SFX Bb ěti ajte .
SFX Bb ěti ajųći .
SFX Bb ěti ajųća .
SFX Bb ěti ajųće .
SFX Bb ěti ajemy .
SFX Bb ěti ajema .
SFX Bb ěti ajemo .
SFX Bb ti vši .
SFX Bb ti vša .
SFX Bb ti vše .
SFX Bb ti ny .
SFX Bb ti na .
SFX Bb ti no .
SFX Bb ti ńje .

SFX Bc Y 32
SFX Bc ti l .
SFX Bc ti la .
SFX Bc ti lo .
SFX Bc ti li .
SFX Bc ti jų .
SFX Bc ti jem .
SFX Bc ti ješ .
SFX Bc ti je .
SFX Bc ti jemȯ .
SFX Bc ti jete .
SFX Bc ti jųt .
SFX Bc ti h .
SFX Bc ti še .
SFX Bc ti hmȯ .
SFX Bc ti ste .
SFX Bc ti hų .
SFX Bc ti j .
SFX Bc ti jmȯ .
SFX Bc ti jte .
SFX Bc ti jųći .
SFX Bc ti jųća .
SFX Bc ti jųće .
SFX Bc ti jemy .
SFX Bc ti jema .
SFX Bc ti jemo .
SFX Bc ti vši .
SFX Bc ti vša .
SFX Bc ti vše .
SFX Bc ti ny .
SFX Bc ti na .
SFX Bc ti no .
SFX Bc ti ńje .

SFX Bd Y 28
SFX Bd 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bd y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Bd y a/xPxE .
SFX Bd y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Bd y ų/xPxE .
SFX Bd y oj/xPxE .
SFX Bd y om/xPxE .
SFX Bd y omu/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bd y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Bd y i/xPxE .
SFX Bd y e/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Bd gy žějši/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšego/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšemu/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšim/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšem/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějše/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějša/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšų/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšej/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšejų/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějših/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšim/zz .
SFX Bd gy žějšimi/zz .
SFX Bd gy žeje/zz .
