dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
lizati/BP
sobě/BQ
si/BR
liti/BS
plåmenj/BU
låkȯť/BV
loś/BW
gorěti/BY
měh/BZ
vysoky/Ba
iměti/Bb
imati/Bc
směh/BZ
drågy/Bd
posrědnji/BX
język/BT
pomněti/BY
ćudi/BX
čuti/BS
tŕpěti/BY
bok/BT
strah/BZ
greměti/BY
zvųk/BT
krok/BT
iměti/Bb
imati/Bc
iměti/BS
prošedši/BX
pěši/BX
orěh/BZ
oblåk/BT
děti/BS
nogȯť/BV
ryś/BW
rizik/BT
råzviti/BS
kamenj/BU
skazati/BP
mak/BT
okazati/BP
lěnji/BX
tvorčji/BX
jęčmenj/BU
uspěh/BZ
usměh/BZ
grěh/BZ
podzrěti/BY
myti/BS
bųdųći/BX
grěti/BS
strajk/BT
vȯzduh/BZ
pokazati/BP
grebenj/BU
mazati/BP
dateljnik/BT
kazati/BP
piti/BS
pripomněti/BY
bolěti/BY
ubiti/BS
časovnik/BT
jelenj/BU
lěpši/BX
rybnik/BT
prětŕpěti/BY
prědšedši/BX
blok/BT
vęzati/BP
gråh/BZ
karaś/BW
gųś/BW
izpiti/BS
kryti/BS
napomněti/BY
nastojęći/BX
prědskazati/BP
korenj/BU
mněti/BY
daljši/BX
kremenj/BU
dȯlgy/Bd
nakazati/BP
pŕnik/BT
vŕh/BZ
kazati/BP
ruh/BZ
najlučši/BX
iměti/BS
rězati/BP
tŕpěti/BY
ček/BT
tok/BT
svęzati/BP
pråh/BZ
starějši/BX
prědnji/BX
obvęzati/BP
obliti/BS
utŕpěti/BY
iztŕpěti/BY
najnovějši/BX
iměti/BS
zrěti/BS
uzrěti/BY
biti/BS
pobiti/BS
věk/BT
krah/BZ
unižajųći/BX
vȯzdyh/BZ
trikųtnik/BT
odrězati/BP
duži/BX
podliti/BS
glåsnik/BT
odkazati/BP
konjak/BT
čajnik/BT
izbuh/BZ
vodotok/BT
sųmråk/BT
blěsk/BT
drugy/Bd
zadnji/BX
pråšek/BT
briti/BS
umyvaľnik/BT
gniti/BS
nagy/Bd
probiti/BS
popiti/BS
upiti/BS
izgniti/BS
viti/BS
šokujųći/BX
neposrědnji/BX
postrah/BZ
najglųbši/BX
pospěh/BZ
pripomněti/BY
vȯzpomněti/BY
imeniteljnik/BT
mråk/BT
sluh/BZ
tekųći/BX
proliti/BS
zapisnik/BT
božji/BX
odpovědnik/BT
urězati/BP
neuspěh/BZ
bogatši/BX
dyh/BZ
divnějši/BX
dokazati/BP
dȯždnik/BT
zmiji/BX
rukzak/BT
izrězati/BP
jutrišnji/BX
každogodišnji/BX
klik/BT
krasnějši/BX
cvětųći/BX
mlådši/BX
najbogatši/BX
najvęćši/BX
najkrasivši/BX
najkrvavši/BX
najmenši/BX
najpozdnějši/BX
najstarějši/BX
najzimnějši/BX
prězrěti/BY
obrězati/BP
pŕdak/BT
pętikųtnik/BT
povyši/BX
pravovųgȯľnik/BT
prěrězati/BP
prěsvęzati/BP
puh/BZ
råzbiti/BS
råzbolěti/BS
råzvivajųći/BX
råvnoznačnik/BT
spomněti/BY
spųtnik/BT
strogy/Bd
šestikųtnik/BT
tŕbuh/BZ
udivjajųći/BX
větrak/BT
vśakogodišnji/BX
zabolěti/BY
zakazati/BP
zapah/BZ
zautrišnji/BX
barak/BT
lučši/BX
oddyh/BZ
pȯlk/BT
ptačji/BX
bobŕji/BX
četyrokųtnik/BT
trivųgȯľnik/BT
vtornik/BT
mnogovųgȯľnik/BT
zvateljnik/BT
vytŕpěti/BY
děti/BS
zaměšivajųći/BX
prědložnik/BT
sųći/BX
dnevnik/BT
domašnji/BX
duh/BZ
iměti/BS
kožuh/BZ
kryti/BS
lancuh/BZ
legši/BX
najprostějši/BX
nebogy/Bd
oblizati/BP
pončik/BT
råzgovornik/BT
sliti/BS
svęzati/BP
šeršenj/BU
skrběti/BY
skripěti/BY
stih/BZ
trojskok/BT
ubogy/Bd
vęzati/BP
zadŕžnik/BT
zavęzati/BP
žędajųći/BX
nyněšnji/BX
odkazati/BP
okazati/BP
počętkujųći/BX
pozrěti/BY
prikazati/BP
råbotči/BX
ubědajųći/BX
ukazati/BP
mah/BZ
mogųći/BX
nabiti/BS
navęzati/BP
odbiti/BS
råzmah/BZ
tuk/BT
frank/BT
privęzati/BP
råzkazati/BP
směti/BS
umarjajųći/BX
urok/BT
tųgy/Bd
otok/BT
styk/BT
råzvęzati/BP
blågovolěti/BY
povsednji/BX
vrěti/BY
značek/BT
najdaljši/BX
zapaľnik/BT
šiti/BS
zašiti/BS
prišiti/BS
iměti/BS
iměti/BS
volěti/BY
vpiti/BS
råzviti/BS
namordnik/BT
politi/BS
izbiti/BS
podgrěti/BS
zahvaćajųći/BX
almanah/BZ
bazilik/BT
bezmozgy/Bd
beznogy/Bd
bezrogy/Bd
bosonogy/Bd
brěk/BT
byčji/BX
delfińji/BX
gȯlk/BT
govęďji/BX
izliti/BS
izplěti/BS
iztok/BT
jagnęťji/BX
jednonogy/Bd
jesennji/BX
kopytnik/BT
kråtkonogy/Bd
kråvji/BX
krivonogy/Bd
labęďji/BX
liśji/BX
lopuh/BZ
losoś/BW
masljak/BT
medvěďji/BX
nagrěti/BS
nakolěnnik/BT
naliti/BS
napiti/BS
narězati/BP
našiti/BS
natŕpěti/BY
navęzati/BP
naviti/BS
nemnogy/Bd
nizati/BP
njuh/BZ
obmazati/BP
obȯzrěti/BY
obriti/BS
obuh/BZ
obuti/BS
obvęzati/BP
obviti/BS
odbiti/BS
oglåvnik/BT
opiti/BS
opiti/BS
oplěti/BS
orľji/BX
pŕstenj/BU
råzgrěti/BS
råzliti/BS
råzmazati/BP
råzrězati/BP
råzuti/BS
saundtrek/BT
tlěti/BS
vděti/BS
velěti/BY
viti/BS
vyti/BS
zlověšći/BX
plěti/BS
hak/BT
pomazati/BP
namazati/BP
vȯzklicaľnik/BT
větrik/BT
skok/BT
nanizati/BP
sviti/BS
ryti/BS
izšiti/BS
briti/BS
obriti/BS
fartuh/BZ
onȯgdašnji/BX
svŕběti/BY
včerašnji/BX
nebožčik/BT
najboljši/BX
bifštek/BT
probiti/BS
finik/BT
vseznajųći/BX
pribiti/BS
odvęzati/BP
sliti/BS
iměti/BS
diplodok/BT
rudnik/BT
šuměti/BY
iměti/BS
odliti/BS
iměti/BS
